Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 42.30.070 and 2022 c 115 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governing body of a public agency shall provide the time for holding regular meetings by ordinance, resolution, bylaws, or by whatever other rule is required for the conduct of business by that body. Unless otherwise provided for in the act under which the public agency was formed, meetings of the governing body need not be held within the boundaries of the territory over which the public agency exercises jurisdiction. If at any time any regular meeting falls on a holiday, such regular meeting shall be held on the next business day.(2) If, by reason of fire, flood, earthquake, or other emergency, there is a need for expedited action by a governing body to meet the emergency, the presiding officer of the governing body may provide for a meeting site other than the regular meeting site, for a remote meeting without a physical location, or for a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency, and the notice requirements of this chapter shall be suspended during such emergency.(3) During a state or federally declared emergency in response to a natural disaster, it shall not be a violation of the requirements of this chapter for a majority of the members of a governing body to attend briefings held by county, state, or federal agencies responding to the natural disaster; to conduct visual inspections of damage from the natural disaster by boat, plane, or other vehicle; or to hold or attend press conferences related to the natural disaster: PROVIDED, That they take no final action as defined in this chapter.(4) It shall not be a violation of the requirements of this chapter for a majority of the members of a governing body to travel together or gather for purposes other than a regular meeting or a special meeting as these terms are used in this chapter: PROVIDED, That they take no action as defined in this chapter.Sec. 2. RCW 42.30.230 and 2022 c 115 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If, after the declaration of an emergency by a local or state government or agency, or by the federal government, a public agency determines that it cannot hold a meeting of the governing body with members or public attendance in person with reasonable safety because of the emergency, the public agency may:(a) Hold a remote meeting of the governing body without a physical location; or(b) Hold a meeting of the governing body at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency.(2) During a remote meeting, members of the governing body may appear or attend by phone or by other electronic means that allows real-time verbal communication without being in the same physical location. For a remote meeting or a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency, the public agency must provide an option for the public to listen to the proceedings telephonically or by using a readily available alternative in real-time that does not require any additional cost for participation. Free readily available options include, but are not limited to, broadcast by the public agency on a locally available cable television station that is available throughout the jurisdiction or other electronic, internet, or other means of remote access that does not require any additional cost for access to the program. The public agency may also allow the other electronic means of remote access.(3) No action may be taken at a remote meeting or a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency if the public agency has not provided an option for the public to listen to proceedings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, except for an executive session as authorized in this chapter or as authorized in subsection (7) of this section.(4) Notice of a remote meeting without a physical location or a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency must be provided in accordance with this chapter and must include instructions on how the public may listen live to proceedings and on how the public may access any other electronic means of remote access offered by the public agency.(5) A remote meeting or a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency that is held under the provisions of this section shall be considered open and public in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this section alters the ability of public agencies to take action in response to an emergency as provided for in RCW 42.30.070, or to have members of a governing body participate in a meeting remotely with no declared emergency.(6) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, any governing body of a public agency which held some of its regular meetings remotely prior to March 1, 2020, may continue to hold some of its regular meetings remotely with no declared emergency so long as the public agency provides an option for the public to listen to the proceedings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.(7) During a state or federally declared emergency in response to a natural disaster, a governing body of a local government located within the area of the declared emergency may take action on items directly related to the declared emergency at a remote meeting or a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency including, but not limited to:(a) Authorizing emergency measures;(b) Approving emergency ordinances;(c) Approving spending or contracts to manage disaster response or recovery; or(d) Approving agreements with state or federal agencies to manage disaster response or recovery.--- END ---